California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(A) Hospitals seeking to place a patient into their own distinct-part nursing facilities shall be approved for acute administrative days for a patient determined to need long-term nursing facility care, who remains in an acute care bed during the placement period. If a contacted freestanding nursing facility was able and willing to admit the patient during the 25-day period, the hospital’s treatment authorization request shall be subsequently authorized for approval of acute administrative days until the date that the freestanding nursing facility is able to accept the patient.

At the completion of the reasonable placement effort period, if no freestanding nursing facility is able and willing to take the patient, the
 hospital’s treatment authorization request shall be authorized for approval for acute administrative days for days of care during the reasonable placement period. The hospital, in order to comply with this subparagraph, shall complete the 25-day placement period if there is a freestanding nursing facility within the applicable mileage or travel time willing to take the patient, but due to occupancy, is unable to accept transfer on the days it was contacted. If, however, there is a freestanding nursing facility within the applicable mileage or travel time, but the freestanding nursing facility is not able or willing to admit the patient at the time of the placement effort or in the future, the length of placement time required shall vary and may be shorter than 25 days. If documentation establishes that no freestanding nursing facility within the applicable mileage or travel time, is, or will ever be, able or willing to admit the patient, further placement efforts shall not be required. The distinct-part
 nursing facility rate of reimbursement shall be approved upon the patient’s admission to the distinct-part nursing facility if reasonable placement efforts requirement has been met and no freestanding nursing facility within the applicable mileage or travel time standard was able and willing to accept the patient.

(B) When a patient is either admitted to a distinct-part nursing facility from an acute hospital, nonacute facility, or community setting, or was a distinct-part nursing facility resident whose care has been, but is no longer being, paid by another payment source, a treatment authorization request shall be approved at the distinct-part nursing facility rate for a patient who has been admitted and determined to need long-term nursing facility placement when the reasonable placement efforts requirement has been met. If a contacted freestanding nursing facility is able and willing to admit the patient during the 25-day period, the
 distinct-part nursing facility treatment authorization request shall be subsequently authorized for approval at the distinct-part nursing facility rate until the date that the freestanding nursing facility is able to accept the patient. If the basis on which the final distinct-part nursing facility approval is sought is the lack of any freestanding nursing facility able and willing to take the patient after reasonable placement efforts, this approval shall not be given until after the completion of the reasonable placement period, but may be given for days of care during that period. The criteria for shortening the reasonable placement period to less than 25 days shall apply. Notwithstanding the general requirement that skilled nursing care must receive prior authorization, when a distinct-part nursing facility admits a patient during the time it is making reasonable placement efforts, authorization of the distinct-part nursing facility rate may be given postadmission.

However, no days of care shall be authorized for any period prior to the receipt of the treatment authorization request from the facility, unless retroactive authorization may be given.

(C) When a patient spends some of the placement period in the hospital and some of that time in a distinct-part nursing facility, acute administrative days shall be authorized for the hospital days and the distinct-part nursing facility rate for the distinct-part nursing facility days, subject to the provisions of this paragraph.

(5) Reasonable placement efforts, as defined in paragraph (3), shall be conducted for all patients in need of long-term nursing care who are seeking admission to a distinct-part nursing facility pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 51335 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations. Patients requiring nursing
 care for postsurgical rehabilitative or therapy services shall not be subject to the reasonable placement efforts required for admission to a distinct-part nursing facility but they shall be subject to all other Medi-Cal criteria for these admissions. A patient, who is a resident of a distinct-part nursing facility and who has been hospitalized for more than the seven-day bed-hold period, may be readmitted to the distinct-part nursing facility without meeting the reasonable placement efforts requirement for admission, if the attending physician documents that discharge to a freestanding nursing facility will result in physical or psychological harm.

(6) If a distinct-part nursing facility desires of its own volition to admit a patient needing nursing care at the freestanding nursing facility rate, the department shall approve a treatment authorization request submitted for approval at that rate. Distinct-part nursing facilities shall be
 enrolled in the Medi-Cal program as a freestanding nursing facility provider for that purpose, in addition to being otherwise enrolled in the Medi-Cal program. A distinct-part nursing facility objecting to the freestanding nursing facility rate in any other circumstance, such as when it has not accepted the rate of its own volition, shall not be deemed to have waived its rights to administrative appeal and further review.

(7) With respect to acute care hospitals that are licensed for distinct-part nursing beds, and determined by the State Department of Health Services to provide special services to a unique population, the department shall enact and enforce no regulation, field office instruction, or preadmission screening criteria that restricts a Medi-Cal beneficiary’s freedom to seek admission to a nursing facility or unit that is a distinct part of an acute care hospital on terms or conditions different from those governing admission to a
 long-term care facility.

(c) The department may waive the requirements of this section if it can be demonstrated that both of the following apply:

(1) Access to care is compromised for a specific patient population.

(2) The facility can demonstrate an increase in acute administrative days that are attributable to unsuccessful placement efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 60.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.95. Primary Care Provider Enrollment [14092. - 14092.35.]

14092.

It is the purpose of this article to ensure that the Medi-Cal program is operated in the most cost-effective and efficient manner possible by assuring that beneficiaries have early and ongoing access to identified sources of quality primary care who have agreed to accept Medi-Cal patients. In so doing, it is intended to optimally realize the quality of care and health care financing benefits demonstrated by the experience of successful commercial managed care plans when patients affiliate with a single, specified primary care provider and management of patient
 care is placed within the control of the responsible primary care provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 85.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.05.

For purposes of this article “primary care provider” is defined as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14088.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 85.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.1.

The department shall seek all federal waivers necessary to allow federal financial participation in expenditures under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 85.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.15.

The director shall investigate and may to the extent feasible require that:

(a) Primary care providers specify their capacity to accept Medi-Cal Patients and obtain a primary care provider project code under which fee-for-service Medi-Cal beneficiaries may enroll with the provider as their exclusive primary care source.

(b) Each primary care provider accept and enroll fee-for-service beneficiaries up to the provider’s specified
 capacity.

(c) Any managed care contractor serving children with conditions eligible under the California Children’s Services program shall maintain and follow standards of care established by the program, including use of paneled providers and CCS approved special care centers and shall follow treatment plans approved by the program, including specified services and providers of services. If there are insufficient paneled providers willing to enter into contracts with the managed care contractor, the program shall seek to establish new paneled providers willing to contract. If a paneled provider cannot be found, the managed care contractor shall seek program approval to use a specific nonpaneled provider with appropriate qualifications.

(d) Any managed care contractor serving children with conditions eligible under the CCS program shall report expenditures and savings separately
 for CCS covered services and CCS eligible children. If the managed care contractor is paid according to a capitated or risk-based payment methodology, there shall be a separate actuarially sound rate for CCS-eligible children.

(e) This article is not intended to and shall not be interpreted to permit any reduction in benefits or eligibility levels under the CCS program. Any medically necessary service not available under the managed care contracts authorized under this article shall remain the responsibility of the state and county.

(f) To assure CCS benefits are provided to enrollees with a CCS-eligible condition according to CCS program standards, there shall be oversight by the state and local CCS program agencies for both services covered and not covered by the managed care contract.

(g) Beneficiaries enroll with
 or are assigned to a primary care provider who will be the exclusive source of fee-for-service primary care for the beneficiary. However, enrollment under this article shall be subordinated to any legal requirement that a beneficiary enroll in a Medi-Cal managed care plan contracting under this chapter or (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200)).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 85.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.2.

The director may establish policy and procedures that assure that outpatient physician’s services, and any other Medi-Cal services the director may designate, provided by a source other than the primary care provider with whom a beneficiary is enrolled under this article, shall not be covered under the Medi-Cal program unless they are provided on an emergency basis or authorized by the responsible primary care provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 85.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.25.

In areas where a Medi-Cal beneficiary has the opportunity to enroll in a Medi-Cal managed care plan or to enroll with a primary care provider under this article, the director may require a beneficiary who is certified pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14016.5 that he or she has an established relationship with a provider, to enroll in a managed care plan, a pilot project, or a primary care provider under this article, if the beneficiary relies on care provided by hospital emergency departments for nonemergency care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 85.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.3.

In implementing this article, the director has discretion to extend administrative or reimbursement flexibilities to participating primary care providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 85.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14092.35.

To the extent that this article proves to be effective in reducing the cost of uncoordinated primary care delivered in the hospital emergency room or the costs of duplicative, unnecessary, or avoidable services, program savings may be shared with primary care providers who enroll beneficiaries under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 704.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.97. Managed Care Plan Contracts [14093. - 14093.10.]

14093.

The purpose of this article is to ensure quality of care and to provide increased access to health care services in the most cost-effective and efficient manner possible, to persons who are eligible to receive medical benefits under publicly supported programs other than Medi-Cal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 86.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14093.05.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise authorized pursuant to this chapter, the director shall enter into contracts, under this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), with managed care plans licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), for the provision of medical benefits to all persons who are eligible to receive medical benefits under publicly supported programs. The
 director may also amend existing Medi-Cal managed care contracts to include the provision of medical benefits to persons who are eligible to receive medical benefits under publicly supported programs. Contracts may be on an exclusive or nonexclusive basis.

(2) Prior to issuing a new request for proposal or entering into new contracts pursuant to paragraph (1), the director shall provide an opportunity for interested stakeholders to provide input to inform the development of contract provisions.

(b) Contractors pursuant to this article and participating providers acting pursuant to subcontracts with those contractors, shall agree to hold harmless the beneficiaries of the publicly supported programs if the
 contract between the sponsoring government agency and the contractor does not ensure sufficient funding to cover program benefits.

(c) Any managed care contractor serving children with conditions eligible under the California Children’s Services (CCS) program shall maintain and follow standards of care established by the program, including use of paneled providers and CCS-approved special care centers and shall follow treatment plans approved by the program, including specified services and providers of services. If there are insufficient paneled providers willing to enter into contracts with the managed care contractor, the program shall seek to establish new paneled providers willing to contract. If a paneled provider cannot be found, the managed care contractor shall seek program approval to use a specific nonpaneled provider with
 appropriate qualifications.

(d) (1) Any managed care contractor serving children with conditions eligible under the CCS program shall report expenditures and savings separately for CCS-covered services and CCS-eligible children.

(2) If the managed care contractor is paid according to a capitated or risk-based payment methodology, there shall be separate actuarially sound rates for CCS-eligible children.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a managed care pilot project may, if approval is obtained from the State CCS program director, utilize an alternative rate structure for CCS-eligible children.

(e) This article is not intended
 to and shall not be interpreted to permit any reduction in benefits or eligibility levels under the CCS program. Any medically necessary service not available under the managed care contracts authorized under this article shall remain the responsibility of the state and county.

(f) To assure CCS benefits are provided to enrollees with a CCS-eligible condition according to CCS program standards, there shall be oversight by the state and local CCS program agencies for both services covered and not covered by the managed care contract.

(g) Any managed care contract that will affect the delivery of care to CCS-eligible children shall be approved by the state CCS program director prior to execution. The state CCS program shall continue to be responsible for selection of
 CCS-paneled providers and monitoring of contractors to see that CCS state standards are maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 266, Sec. 2.   (AB 614)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14093.06.

(a) When a managed care contractor that is authorized to provide California Children’s Services (CCS) covered services pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14094.3 or Article 2.985 (commencing with Section 14094.4) expands a managed care plan’s CCS coverage area to other counties, the contractor shall comply with CCS program standards including, but not limited to, referral of newborns to the appropriate neonatal intensive care level, referral of children requiring pediatric intensive care to CCS-approved pediatric intensive care units, and referral of children with CCS eligible conditions to CCS-approved inpatient facilities and special care centers in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 14093.05.

(b) The managed care contractor shall comply with CCS program medical eligibility regulations. Questions regarding interpretation of state CCS medical eligibility regulations, or disagreements between the county CCS program and the managed care contractor regarding interpretation of those regulations, shall be resolved by the local CCS program, in consultation with the state CCS program. The resolution determined by the CCS program shall be communicated in writing to the managed care contractor.

(c) In following the treatment plan developed in accordance with CCS program requirements, the managed care contractor shall ensure the timely referral of children with special health care needs to CCS-paneled providers who are board-certified in both pediatrics and in the appropriate pediatric subspecialty.

(d) The managed care
 contractor shall report expenditures and savings separately for CCS covered services and CCS eligible children, in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14093.05.

(e) All children who are enrolled with a managed care contractor who are seeking CCS program benefits shall retain all rights to CCS program appeals and fair hearings of denials of medical eligibility or of service authorizations. Information regarding the number, nature, and disposition of appeals and fair hearings shall be part of an annual report to the Legislature on managed care contractor compliance with CCS standards, regulations, and procedures. This report shall be made available to the public.

(f) The department, in consultation with stakeholder groups, shall develop unique pediatric plan performance standards and measurements, including, but not limited to, the health outcomes of children
 with special health care needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 4.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14093.07.

For purposes of this article the following definitions apply:

(a) “Foster child” means any child who has been taken into custody or placed by a juvenile court pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 300) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 or Section 601 or 602.

(b) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means any person or entity that has entered into a contract with the director pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section
 14087.3), Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088), or Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089) of this chapter or pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 14200) of Chapter 8.

(c) “Out-of-county placement” means any foster care placement in which the child has been placed outside of the county with the responsibility for the care and placement of the child.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 65.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14093.08.

Sections 1371 and 1371.35 of the Health and Safety Code apply to Medi-Cal managed care plan contracts entered into with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 763, Sec. 10.   (AB 3275)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14093.09.

(a) No child in foster care shall be required to enroll in a Medi-Cal managed care plan. A foster child may be voluntarily enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care plan only when the county child welfare agency with responsibility for the care and placement of the child, in consultation with the child’s foster caregiver, determines that it is in the best interest of the child to do so and the department determines that enrollment is available to the child.

(b) Whenever a foster
 child is placed in an out-of-county placement, the county child welfare agency with responsibility for the care and placement of the child shall determine, in consultation with the child’s foster caregiver, if the child should remain in, or has enrolled in, a Medi-Cal managed care plan in the county where the child will be placed or in the county with responsibility for the care and placement of the child, as long as the department determines that enrollment is available for the child.

(c) The State Department of Health Services shall establish for Medi-Cal managed care plans urgent disenrollment procedures that provide for disenrollment of foster children in out-of-county placements within two working days of receipt by the department’s enrollment contractor, or the department, if the department has no enrollment contractor, of a request for disenrollment made by the child welfare services agency, the foster caregiver, or other person
 authorized to make medical decisions on behalf of the foster child.

(d) Medi-Cal managed care plans shall process and pay appropriately documented claims submitted by out-of-plan providers for services provided to foster children in out-of-county placements while they are Medi-Cal members of the plan. This section shall not be construed to prevent a plan from requiring prior authorization for nonemergency services consistent with the plan’s established policies and procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 66.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14093.10.

(a) Whenever a foster child enrolled in a county organized health system, established pursuant to Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), is placed in an out-of-county placement, the county child welfare agency or probation department with responsibility for the care and placement of the child shall determine, in consultation with the child’s foster caregiver, whether the child should remain enrolled in that county organized health system. The determination shall be made no later than one working day after the out-of-county placement
 begins.

(b) If it is determined, pursuant to subdivision (a) or at any later date, that a foster child should be disenrolled from a county organized health system due to an out-of-county placement, the county child welfare agency or probation department with responsibility for the care and placement of the child shall request that the child be disenrolled from the county organized health system. The request shall be made to the entity designated by the State Department of Health Care Services to receive requests for disenrollment or to the department, if the department has no designee, no later than one working day after either of the following occurs:

(1) The out-of-county placement begins.

(2) It is determined that a child who initially remained enrolled in the county organized health system following the
 out-of-county placement, pursuant to subdivision (a), should subsequently be disenrolled.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, in consultation with other agencies and organizations interested in health care access for foster children, establish for county organized health systems urgent disenrollment procedures that provide for disenrollment of foster children in out-of-county placements within two working days of receipt by the department’s designee or by the department, if the department has no designee, of a request for disenrollment made by the county child welfare services agency, the county probation department, the foster caregiver, or any other person authorized to make medical decisions on behalf of the foster child.

(d) The department shall issue all-county letters or similar instructions to implement subdivision (c) no later than January 1, 2009, and
 thereafter shall adopt any necessary implementing regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.98. California Children’s Services Program and Medi-Cal Managed Care Contracts [14094. - 14094.3.]

14094.

For purposes of this article “CCS” means California Children’s Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 917, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.1.

(a) The director shall investigate and to the extent feasible require any managed care contractor serving children with conditions eligible under the CCS program, to maintain and follow standards of care established by the program, including use of paneled providers and CCS approved special care centers and to follow treatment plans approved by the program, including specified services and providers of services. If there are insufficient paneled providers willing to enter into contracts with the managed care contractor, the program shall
 seek to establish new paneled providers willing to contract. If a paneled provider cannot be found, the managed care contractor shall seek program approval to use a specific nonpaneled provider with appropriate qualifications.

(b) The director shall investigate and to the extent feasible require any managed care contractor serving children with conditions eligible under the CCS program, to report expenditures and savings separately for CCS covered services and CCS eligible children.

(c) (1) If the managed care contractor is paid according to a capitated or risk-based payment methodology, there shall be a separate actuarially sound rate for CCS eligible children.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a managed care pilot project may, if approval is obtained from the state CCS program director,
 utilize an alternative rate structure for CCS eligible children.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 917, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.2.

(a) This article is not intended, and shall not be interpreted, to permit any reduction in benefits or eligibility levels under the CCS program. Any medically necessary service not available under the managed care contracts authorized under this article shall remain the responsibility of the state and county.

(b) (1) In Whole Child Model counties authorized pursuant to Article 2.985 (commencing with Section 14094.4), in order to ensure that CCS benefits are provided to enrollees with a CCS-eligible condition according to CCS program standards, there shall be oversight by the department for both services covered and not covered by the managed care contract.

(2) In counties not listed in Section 14094.5, in order to ensure that CCS benefits are provided to enrollees with a CCS-eligible condition according to CCS program standards, there shall be oversight by the department and local CCS program agencies for both services covered and not covered by the managed care contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 5.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.3.

(a) Notwithstanding this article or Section 14093.05 or 14094.1, CCS covered services shall not be incorporated into any Medi-Cal managed care contract entered into after August 1, 1994, pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088), Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089), Article 2.95 (commencing with Section 14092); or either Article 1 (commencing with Section 14200), or Article 7 (commencing with Section 14490) of Chapter 8, until January 1, 2022, and until the evaluation required pursuant to Section 14094.18 has been completed, except for contracts entered into pursuant to the Whole Child Model program, as described in Article 2.985 (commencing with Section 14094.4), or for
 county organized health systems or Regional Health Authority in the Counties of San Mateo, Santa Barbara, Solano, Yolo, Marin, and Napa.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, providers serving children under the CCS program who are enrolled with a Medi-Cal managed care contractor but who are not enrolled in a pilot project pursuant to subdivision (c) shall continue to submit billing for CCS covered services on a fee-for-service basis until CCS covered services are incorporated into the Medi-Cal managed care contracts described in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The department may authorize a pilot project in Solano County in which reimbursement for conditions eligible under the CCS program may be reimbursed on a capitated basis pursuant to Section 14093.05, and provided all CCS program’s guidelines, standards, and regulations are adhered to, and
 the CCS program’s case management is utilized.

(2) During the time period described in subdivision (a), the department may approve, implement, and evaluate limited pilot projects under the CCS program to test alternative managed care models tailored to the special health care needs of children under the CCS program. The pilot projects may include, but need not be limited to, coverage of different geographic areas, focusing on certain subpopulations, and the employment of different payment and incentive models. Pilot project proposals from CCS program-approved providers shall be given preference. All pilot projects shall utilize CCS program-approved standards and providers pursuant to Section 14094.1.

(d) For purposes of this section, CCS covered services include all program benefits administered by the program specified in Section 123840 of the Health and Safety Code regardless of
 the funding source.

(e) This section shall not be construed to exclude or restrict CCS-eligible children from enrollment with a managed care contractor, or from receiving from the managed care contractor with which they are enrolled primary and other health care unrelated to the treatment of the CCS-eligible condition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 6.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.985. Whole Child Model Program [14094.4. - 14094.20.]

14094.4.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “CCS provider” means any of the following:

(1) A medical provider that is paneled by the CCS program to treat a CCS-eligible condition pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 123800) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A licensed acute care hospital approved by the CCS program to treat a CCS-eligible condition.

(3) A special care center approved by the CCS program to treat a CCS-eligible condition.

(b) “County organized health system” or “COHS” means:

(1) A county organized health system contracting with the department to provide Medi-Cal services to beneficiaries pursuant to Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(2) A regional health authority.

(c) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means a COHS, or, commencing no sooner than January 1, 2024, an alternate health care service plan contracted with the department pursuant to Section 14197.11 in any county described in Section 14094.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 73, Sec. 1.   (AB 2724)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.5.

(a) No sooner than July 1, 2017, the department may establish a Whole Child Model program for Medi-Cal eligible CCS children and youth enrolled in a managed care plan served by a county organized health system or Regional Health Authority, or commencing no sooner than January 1, 2024, an alternate health care service plan contracted with the department pursuant to Section 14197.11, in the following counties: Del Norte, Humboldt, Lake, Lassen, Marin, Mendocino, Merced, Modoc, Monterey, Napa, Orange, San Luis Obispo, San Mateo, Santa Barbara, Santa Cruz, Shasta, Siskiyou, Solano, Sonoma, Trinity, and Yolo.

(b) No sooner than January 1, 2025, the department may establish a Whole Child Model program for Medi-Cal eligible CCS children and youth enrolled in a managed care plan served by a county organized health system or Regional Health Authority in the following counties: Butte, Colusa, Glenn, Nevada, Placer, Plumas, Sierra, Sutter, Tehama, Yuba, Mariposa, and San Benito.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 128.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.6.

The goals for the Whole Child Model program for children and youth under 21 years of age who meet the eligibility requirements of Section 123805 of the Health and Safety Code and are enrolled in a managed care plan under a county organized health system or Regional Health Authority, or an alternate health care service plan contracted with the department pursuant to Section 14197.11, shall include all of the following:

(a) Improving the coordination of primary and preventive services with specialty care services, medical therapy units, Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment (EPSDT), long-term services and supports (LTSS), regional center services, and home- and community-based services
 using a child and youth and family-centered approach.

(b) Maintaining or exceeding CCS program standards and specialty care access, including access to appropriate subspecialties.

(c) Providing for the continuity of child and youth access to expert, CCS dedicated case management and care coordination, provider referrals, and service authorizations.

(d) Improving the transition of youth from CCS to adult Medi-Cal managed systems of care through better coordination of medical and nonmedical services and supports and improved access to appropriate adult providers for youth who age out of CCS.

(e) Identifying, tracking, and evaluating the transition of children and
 youth from CCS to the Whole Child Model program to inform future CCS program improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 73, Sec. 3.   (AB 2724)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.65.

This article shall not be construed to exclude or restrict the specialty of neonatology from reimbursement under the California Children’s Services (CCS) program, subject to the program’s existing or applicable prior authorization requirements or utilization review. Neonatology shall be included in the CCS program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 625, Sec. 7.   (SB 586)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14094.7.

(a) No sooner than July 1, 2017, the department may implement the Whole Child Model program established under this section, pursuant to the criteria described in this article. The director shall provide notice to the Legislature, the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, counties, CCS providers, and CCS families when each managed care plan, including a transition plan with the county CCS program, has been reviewed and certified as ready to enroll children based on the criteria described in this article.

(b) The department
 shall do all of the following:

(1) Develop specific CCS program monitoring and oversight standards for managed care plans that are subject to this article, including access monitoring, quality measures, and ongoing public data reporting. No later than January 1, 2025, the department shall, at minimum, do all of the following:

(A) Annually provide an analysis on its internet website regarding trends on CCS enrollment for Whole Child Model counties and non-Whole Child Model counties, in a way that enables a comparison of trends between the two categories of CCS counties.

(B) Develop utilization and quality measures, to be reported
 on an annual basis in a form and manner specified by the department, that relate specifically to CCS specialty care and report such measures for both Whole Child Model counties and non-Whole Child Model counties. When developing measures, the department shall consider both of the following:

(i) Recommendations of the CCS Redesign Performance Measure Quality Subcommittee established by the department as part of the CCS Advisory Group pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14097.17.

(ii) Available data regarding the percentage of children with CCS eligible conditions who receive an annual special care center visit.

(C) Require, as part of its monitoring and oversight responsibilities, any Whole Child Model plan, as applicable, that is subject to one or more findings in its most recent annual medical audit pertaining to
 access or quality of care in the CCS program to implement quality improvement strategies that are specifically targeted to the CCS population, as determined by the department.

(2) Establish a stakeholder process pursuant to Section 14094.17.

(3) Consult with the statewide stakeholder advisory group established pursuant to Section 14094.17 to develop and implement robust monitoring processes to ensure that managed care plans are in compliance with all of the provisions of this section. The department shall monitor managed care plan compliance with the provisions of this section on at least an annual basis and post CCS-specific monitoring dashboards on its
 internet website on at least an annual basis.

(c) (1) In order to aid the transition of CCS services into Medi-Cal managed care plans participating in the Whole Child Model program, commencing January 1, 2017, and continuing through the completion of the transition of CCS enrollees into the Whole Child Model program, the department shall begin requesting and collecting from Medi-Cal managed care plans information about each health plan’s provider network, including, but not limited to, the contracting primary care, specialty care providers, and hospital facilities contracting with the Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) The department shall analyze the existing Medi-Cal managed care delivery system network and the CCS fee-for-service provider networks to determine the overlap of the provider networks in each county and
 shall furnish this information to the Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(d) A managed care plan shall not be approved to participate in the Whole Child Model program unless all of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The managed care plan has obtained written approval from the director.
